Utah statutes.
77-5-3.   Two-thirds vote of House required.

The House of Representatives shall have the sole power of impeachment, but in order to impeach, two-thirds of all the members elected shall vote therefor. Impeachments shall be by resolution. The resolution shall originate in and be adopted by the House of Representatives.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

